Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.060

Fiduciary may hold and retain trust property—Investments—Liability.

Subject to express provisions to the contrary in the trust instrument, any fiduciary may hold and retain any real or personal property received into or acquired by the trust from any source. Except as to trust property acquired for consideration, a fiduciary may hold and retain any such property without need for diversification as to kinds or amount and whether or not the property is income producing.

Any fiduciary may invest funds held in trust under an instrument creating the trust in any manner and in any investment or in any class of investments authorized by the instrument.

The investments described in this section are permissible even though the securities or other property are not permitted under other provisions of this chapter, and even though the securities may be securities issued by the corporation that is the fiduciary.

A fiduciary is not liable for any loss incurred with respect to any investment held under the authority of or pursuant to this section if that investment was permitted when received or when the investment was made by the fiduciary, and if the fiduciary exercises due care and prudence in the disposition or retention of any such investment.

[ 1985 c 30 s 73. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 108.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.